Utah statutes.
31A-5-109.   Compliance extension.

If timely adjustment to a particular requirement applicable to a Chapter 5 mutual would cause a former county mutual, reciprocal insurer, cooperative association, or mutual benefit association hardship, disproportionate expense, or serious inconvenience, the commissioner may, upon the insurer's request, grant an extension for compliance if the interests of insureds and the public are not endangered.  This extension may not be beyond July 1, 1988.  The requirement of payment of taxes and fees is not considered a hardship or a disproportionate expense.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

